csv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_V.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: dakaagamig
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: dakaagamisinog
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: inamog
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: inamosinog
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     inamo+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv+NA: dakaagaminini
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx+NA: [dakaagami,dakaagamin]
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv+NA: dakaagamisinini
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx+NA: dakaagamisinoon
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: MISSING
     dakaagami+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv+NA: imoniniwan
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx+NA: imonoon
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv+NA: imonini
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx+NA: [imo,imon]
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv+NA: imosininiwan
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx+NA: imosinoon
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv+NA: imosinini
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx+NA: imosinoon
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: MISSING
     imo+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: MISSING
